Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 4 Pecans

Cross references.

Failure to pay for pecans, §

16-9-58

.

Ownership rights in pecans falling onto public rights of way, §

44-12-240

et seq.

Pecan equipment, sales and use tax exemption, §

48-8-3

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Additional regulations applicable to pecans, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Food Division Regulations, Subject 40-7-7.

2-14-60.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Grower” means any producer of pecans who does not engage in the business of a processor, as defined in paragraph (2) of this Code section, and who does not sell any pecans at wholesale other than those grown by him.

“Processor” means any person, firm, partnership, or corporation engaged in the business of cracking, shelling, and grading pecan meats for sale or of cleaning, grading, storing, bagging, or selling in-shell pecans, but this term does not include persons engaged solely in retail sales to the consumer.

“Wholesaler” means any person, firm, partnership, or corporation, other than a grower as defined in paragraph (1) of this Code section, who sells pecans to others for the purpose of resale. This term does not apply to anyone who sells pecans only direct to the consumer, unless he is also a processor, as defined in paragraph (2) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 1.

2-14-61.
Licenses required of pecan processors and wholesalers.

Within this state, no person, firm, partnership, or corporation shall engage in the processing of pecans other than those grown by him or it or in selling pecans other than those grown by him or it at wholesale without first obtaining a license to do so from the Department of Agriculture.

Applications for licenses shall be on a form prescribed by the Commissioner.

Duly issued licenses shall be on a form prescribed by the Commissioner. They shall remain in force unless revoked but shall not be transferable.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 2.

2-14-62.
Standards and grades; labels; improper grading or labeling as cause for license revocation.

The Commissioner shall prescribe standards and grades for pecans fit for human consumption. All pecans sold by processors or wholesalers must conform to the prescribed standards and grades and must be labeled accordingly. Improper grading or labeling shall be cause for revocation of the processor’s or wholesaler’s license.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 3.

2-14-63.
Disposition of pecans unfit for human consumption; violation of Code section grounds for license revocation.

Pecans failing to meet the standards prescribed for pecans fit for human consumption shall be destroyed, crushed, or rendered unfit for sale for human consumption by the processors or wholesalers of such pecans. Violation of this Code section shall be sufficient cause for revocation of the processor’s or wholesaler’s license.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 4.

Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner to impose penalty in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

2-14-64.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement this article and to accomplish its purposes. After they are legally adopted and promulgated, such rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 6.

2-14-65.
Injunctions.

In addition to the remedies provided in this article and notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior courts for an injunction. Such courts shall have jurisdiction and for good cause shown shall grant a temporary or permanent injunction or an ex parte or restraining order, restraining or enjoining a person, firm, partnership, or corporation from violating and continuing to violate this article or any rules and regulations promulgated under this article. Such injunction shall be issued without bond. An injunction may be granted notwithstanding the fact that the violation constitutes a criminal act and notwithstanding the pendency of any criminal prosecution for the same violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 7.

2-14-66.
Penalty for violations of article or rules and regulations.

Violation of any provision of this article or of the rules and regulations promulgated under this article shall constitute a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 539, § 5.